Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2021.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3116(d)(1), (m) and (q) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and subsection (d) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 3116. Automated red light enforcement systems in first class cities.* * *(d) Penalty.--(1) The penalty for a violation under subsection (a) shall be a fine of [$100] $125 or higher as provided under paragraph (1.1) unless a lesser amount is set by ordinance.(1.1) The penalty for a violation under subsection (a) may be as follows, upon passage of an ordinance:12345678910111213141516171819 (i) Up to $150 for a violation under subsection (a) if the fine is not paid within 30 days of the mailing of the notice to the owner under subsection (j), unless a lesser amount is set by ordinance.(ii) Up to $175 for a violation under subsection (a) if the fine is not paid within 60 days of the mailing of the notice to the owner under subsection (j), unless a lesser amount is set by ordinance.(iii) Up to $200 for a violation under subsection (a) if the fine is not paid within 90 days of the mailing of the notice to the owner under subsection (j), unless a lesser amount is set by ordinance.(iv) A penalty under this paragraph may not exceed a fine of $200.* * *(m) Hearing.--(1) An owner to whom a notice of violation has been issued may, within 30 days of the mailing of the notice, request a hearing to contest the liability alleged in the notice. A hearing request must be made by appearing before the system administrator during regular office hours either personally or by an authorized agent or by mailing a request in writing.[(2) Upon receipt of a hearing request, the system administrator shall in a timely manner schedule the matter before a hearing officer. The hearing officer shall be designated by the city of the first class. Written notice of the date, time and place of hearing must be sent by first class mail to the owner.(3) The hearing shall be informal; the rules of evidence 20250HB2021PN2580 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall not apply; and the decision of the hearing officer shall be final, subject to the right of the owner to appeal the decision to the traffic court.(4) If the owner requests in writing that the decision of the hearing officer be appealed to the traffic court, the system administrator shall file the notice of violation and supporting documents with the traffic court, which shall hear and decide the matter de novo.](5) Upon receipt of a hearing request, the system administrator shall, in a timely manner, schedule the matter before a hearing officer. The hearing officer shall be designated by the city of the first class. Written notice of the date, time and place of the hearing shall be sent by first class mail to the owner of the motor vehicle. A hearing to contest liability may be in person or be conducted through live stream synchronous video conferencing or similar virtual presence technology and shall be only at the locations and times set by the system administrator.(6) The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 (relating to practice and procedure) and be subject to appeal under 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to judicial review).* * *[(q) Expiration.--This section shall expire July 15, 2027.]Section 2. Section 3117(d), (e)(1), (n), (s) and (t) of Title 75 are amended and subsection (e) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 3117. Automated red light enforcement systems in certain municipalities.* * *20250HB2021PN2580 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Certificate as evidence.--A certificate, or a facsimile of a certificate, based upon inspection of recorded images produced by an automated red light enforcement system and sworn to or affirmed by a police officer employed by the [municipality] police department with primary jurisdiction over the area where the violation occurred shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it. The municipality must include a written statement that the automated red light enforcement system was operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation. A recorded image evidencing a violation of section 3112(a)(3) shall be admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the violation.(e) Penalty.--(1) The penalty for a violation under subsection (a) shall be a fine of [$100] $125 or higher as provided under paragraph (1.1) unless a lesser amount is set by ordinance.(1.1) The penalty for a violation under subsection (a) may be as follows, upon passage of an ordinance:(i) Up to $150 for a violation under subsection (a) if the fine is not paid within 30 days of the mailing of the notice to the owner under subsection (k), unless a lesser amount is set by ordinance.(ii) Up to $175 for a violation under subsection (a) if the fine is not paid within 60 days of the mailing of the notice to the owner under subsection (k), unless a lesser amount is set by ordinance.(iii) Up to $200 for a violation under subsection (a) if the fine is not paid within 90 days of the mailing of the notice to the owner under subsection (k), unless a 20250HB2021PN2580 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lesser amount is set by ordinance.(iv) A penalty under this paragraph may not exceed a fine of $200.* * *(n) Hearing.--(1) An owner to whom a notice of violation has been issued may, within 30 days of the mailing of the notice, request a hearing to contest the liability alleged in the notice. A hearing request must be made by appearing before the system administrator during regular office hours either personally or by an authorized agent or by mailing a request in writing.[(2) Upon receipt of a hearing request, the system administrator shall in a timely manner schedule the matter before a hearing officer. The hearing officer shall be designated by the municipality. Written notice of the date, time and place of hearing must be sent by first class mail to the owner.(3) The hearing shall be informal, the rules of evidence shall not apply and the decision of the hearing officer shall be final, subject to the right of the owner to appeal the decision to the magisterial district judge.(4) If the owner requests in writing that the decision of the hearing officer be appealed to the magisterial district judge, the system administrator shall file the notice of violation and supporting documents with the magisterial district judge, who shall hear and decide the matter de novo.](5) Upon receipt of a hearing request, the system administrator shall, in a timely manner, schedule the matter 20250HB2021PN2580 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 before a hearing officer. The hearing officer shall be designated by the municipality. Written notice of the date, time and place of the hearing shall be sent by first class mail to the owner of the motor vehicle. A hearing to contest liability may be in person or be conducted through live stream synchronous video conferencing or similar virtual presence technology and shall be only at the locations and times set by the system administrator.(6) The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 (relating to practice and procedure) and be subject to appeal under 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to judicial review).* * *[(s) Expiration.--This section shall expire July 15, 2027.](t) Definitions.--As used in this section:(1) The term "designee" shall include a person, business entity or governmental entity, including the department.(2) The term "municipality" means[:(i) A city, borough or township with a population under the 2010 Federal Decennial Census exceeding 20,000 with a police agency accredited by the Pennsylvania Chiefs of Police Association in a county of the second class A.(ii) A city, borough or township with a population under the 2010 Federal Decennial Census exceeding 20,000 with a police agency accredited by the Pennsylvania Chiefs of Police Association in a county of the third class with a population between 490,000 and 510,000.(iii) A city of the second class.] a county, city, borough, incorporated town or township.20250HB2021PN2580 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The amendment of 75 Pa.C.S. §§ 3116(q) and 3117(s).This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2021PN2580 - 7 - 123456